Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-747
Persons under criminal prosecution in this state at time of requisition; Governor; discretionary powers.

If a criminal prosecution has been instituted against such person under the laws of this state and is still pending the Governor, in his discretion, either may surrender him on demand of the Executive Authority of another state or hold him until he has been tried and discharged or convicted and punished in this state.

Laws 1963, c. 159, § 19, p. 564.